SpellChecking/Dictionaries/latin uyghur.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2456 Y 1
SFX 2456 k ing k
SFX 1527 Y 1
SFX 1527 a ingmu a
SFX 525 Y 1
SFX 525 l mgha l
SFX 478 Y 1
SFX 478 a ighin a
SFX 952 Y 1
SFX 952 l ing l
SFX 2700 Y 1
SFX 2700 r shturushi r
SFX 2286 Y 1
SFX 2286 m ing m
SFX 1853 Y 1
SFX 1853 n ing n
SFX 318 Y 1
SFX 318 o ing o
SFX 1951 Y 1
SFX 1951 d rap d
SFX 1969 Y 1
SFX 1969 q mgha q
SFX 4073 Y 1
SFX 4073 r mgha r
SFX 4884 Y 1
SFX 4884 s ing s
SFX 4898 Y 1
SFX 4898 a ikliri a
SFX 3506 Y 1
SFX 3506 t ing t
SFX 4637 Y 1
SFX 4637 a ighinidek a
SFX 277 Y 1
SFX 277 a iridiki a
SFX 2524 Y 1
SFX 2524 a maqchi a
SFX 2325 Y 1
SFX 2325 r shturidighan r
SFX 4753 Y 1
SFX 4753 d rani d
SFX 2703 Y 1
SFX 2703 d shing d
SFX 1462 Y 1
SFX 1462 l maqchi l
SFX 2394 Y 1
SFX 2394 n yda n
SFX 1093 Y 1
SFX 1093 q maqchi q
SFX 1816 Y 1
SFX 1816 i etning i
SFX 1138 Y 1
SFX 1138 f mma f
SFX 3981 Y 1
SFX 3981 q yalmaydu q
SFX 1071 Y 1
SFX 1071 q kige q
SFX 2812 Y 1
SFX 2812 i uruwetken i
SFX 16 Y 1
SFX 16 a imaq a
SFX 332 Y 1
SFX 332 i chilik i
SFX 1085 Y 1
SFX 1085 l pmu l
SFX 1452 Y 1
SFX 1452 m pmu m
SFX 627 Y 1
SFX 627 n pmu n
SFX 2590 Y 1
SFX 2590 m chilik m
SFX 2308 Y 1
SFX 2308 n chilik n
SFX 4190 Y 1
SFX 4190 p chilik p
SFX 3074 Y 1
SFX 3074 k gendek k
SFX 2458 Y 1
SFX 2458 l imaq l
SFX 1722 Y 1
SFX 1722 a inimda a
SFX 2471 Y 1
SFX 2471 p gendek p
SFX 3531 Y 1
SFX 3531 i gli i
SFX 1621 Y 1
SFX 1621 o imaq o
SFX 587 Y 1
SFX 587 y pmu y
SFX 4629 Y 1
SFX 4629 q imaq q
SFX 4941 Y 1
SFX 4941 y chilik y
SFX 1369 Y 1
SFX 1369 k gch k
SFX 196 Y 1
SFX 196 a erning a
SFX 2596 Y 1
SFX 2596 i ushup i
SFX 3202 Y 1
SFX 3202 p gch p
SFX 4155 Y 1
SFX 4155 a ighandur a
SFX 19 Y 1
SFX 19 i gizni i
SFX 1487 Y 1
SFX 1487 i erning i
SFX 717 Y 1
SFX 717 k erning k
SFX 4221 Y 1
SFX 4221 a tisini a
SFX 579 Y 1
SFX 579 a luq a
SFX 3996 Y 1
SFX 3996 a unlar a
SFX 4563 Y 1
SFX 4563 d luq d
SFX 2151 Y 1
SFX 2151 a uqta a
SFX 2699 Y 1
SFX 2699 a sila a
SFX 1247 Y 1
SFX 1247 d sila d
SFX 316 Y 1
SFX 316 a ishini a
SFX 3583 Y 1
SFX 3583 i unlar i
SFX 3150 Y 1
SFX 3150 k luq k
SFX 4873 Y 1
SFX 4873 d ishini d
SFX 4962 Y 1
SFX 4962 n ydighanlardin n
SFX 4472 Y 1
SFX 4472 i uqta i
SFX 1944 Y 1
SFX 1944 a turmaq a
SFX 2730 Y 1
SFX 2730 q luq q
SFX 3461 Y 1
SFX 3461 r luq r
SFX 3019 Y 1
SFX 3019 s luq s
SFX 254 Y 1
SFX 254 a ikini a
SFX 2969 Y 1
SFX 2969 r sila r
SFX 3334 Y 1
SFX 3334 o ishini o
SFX 2236 Y 1
SFX 2236 t sila t
SFX 4538 Y 1
SFX 4538 k ngen k
SFX 3736 Y 1
SFX 3736 i glarmu i
SFX 2173 Y 1
SFX 2173 m ngen m
SFX 2497 Y 1
SFX 2497 z sila z
SFX 531 Y 1
SFX 531 k nidu k
SFX 3347 Y 1
SFX 3347 a iktur a
SFX 1169 Y 1
SFX 1169 m nidu m
SFX 3004 Y 1
SFX 3004 d mni d
SFX 407 Y 1
SFX 407 r ngen r
SFX 719 Y 1
SFX 719 a um a
SFX 1890 Y 1
SFX 1890 t ngen t
SFX 524 Y 1
SFX 524 q nidu q
SFX 2972 Y 1
SFX 2972 r shmigen r
SFX 1796 Y 1
SFX 1796 i mni i
SFX 827 Y 1
SFX 827 k mni k
SFX 362 Y 1
SFX 362 l mni l
SFX 74 Y 1
SFX 74 i um i
SFX 3957 Y 1
SFX 3957 i eklirini i
SFX 3237 Y 1
SFX 3237 p walisen p
SFX 1341 Y 1
SFX 1341 a dash a
SFX 1389 Y 1
SFX 1389 q mni q
SFX 4087 Y 1
SFX 4087 k ll k
SFX 3625 Y 1
SFX 3625 i pereslik i
SFX 1795 Y 1
SFX 1795 r mni r
SFX 3141 Y 1
SFX 3141 s mni s
SFX 3140 Y 1
SFX 3140 t mni t
SFX 329 Y 1
SFX 329 a ishigha a
SFX 3891 Y 1
SFX 3891 q laysiz q
SFX 4718 Y 1
SFX 4718 a ungha a
SFX 2445 Y 1
SFX 2445 r laysiz r
SFX 1046 Y 1
SFX 1046 i rgchi i
SFX 2231 Y 1
SFX 2231 i ungha i
SFX 4614 Y 1
SFX 4614 o ishigha o
SFX 3553 Y 1
SFX 3553 t dash t
SFX 1953 Y 1
SFX 1953 a qini a
SFX 4304 Y 1
SFX 4304 q lisa q
SFX 3427 Y 1
SFX 3427 d qini d
SFX 3466 Y 1
SFX 3466 r lisa r
SFX 528 Y 1
SFX 528 a dur a
SFX 2425 Y 1
SFX 2425 m nga m
SFX 2052 Y 1
SFX 2052 a idingmu a
SFX 1655 Y 1
SFX 1655 p nga p
SFX 600 Y 1
SFX 600 i urushi i
SFX 4700 Y 1
SFX 4700 k ydighanlar k
SFX 1075 Y 1
SFX 1075 a ilitish a
SFX 1919 Y 1
SFX 1919 a hining a
SFX 921 Y 1
SFX 921 n ydighanlar n
SFX 969 Y 1
SFX 969 e hining e
SFX 1562 Y 1
SFX 1562 t ja t
SFX 1218 Y 1
SFX 1218 r qini r
SFX 3230 Y 1
SFX 3230 q ydighanlar q
SFX 692 Y 1
SFX 692 a ichu a
SFX 1217 Y 1
SFX 1217 s qini s
SFX 3275 Y 1
SFX 3275 t qini t
SFX 2212 Y 1
SFX 2212 i hining i
SFX 3398 Y 1
SFX 3398 p walghin p
SFX 1375 Y 1
SFX 1375 p watamsen p
SFX 897 Y 1
SFX 897 t dur t
SFX 4764 Y 1
SFX 4764 a qanlarni a
SFX 4180 Y 1
SFX 4180 x dur x
SFX 3089 Y 1
SFX 3089 r zim r
SFX 1347 Y 1
SFX 1347 p watqinigha p
SFX 581 Y 1
SFX 581 i gizde i
SFX 188 Y 1
SFX 188 n chke n
SFX 660 Y 1
SFX 660 a iqta a
SFX 1525 Y 1
SFX 1525 a irimgha a
SFX 2906 Y 1
SFX 2906 a irimizge a
SFX 198 Y 1
SFX 198 i chilar i
SFX 4206 Y 1
SFX 4206 i wazliq i
SFX 4432 Y 1
SFX 4432 l chilar l
SFX 3532 Y 1
SFX 3532 i giznimu i
SFX 1207 Y 1
SFX 1207 m chilar m
SFX 3557 Y 1
SFX 3557 n chilar n
SFX 2923 Y 1
SFX 2923 i gila i
SFX 3963 Y 1
SFX 3963 p chilar p
SFX 1372 Y 1
SFX 1372 y chke y
SFX 2950 Y 1
SFX 2950 p wetkechke p
SFX 2127 Y 1
SFX 2127 m gila m
SFX 4876 Y 1
SFX 4876 q iqta q
SFX 778 Y 1
SFX 778 i ulla i
SFX 4686 Y 1
SFX 4686 y chilar y
SFX 3124 Y 1
SFX 3124 r qliqi r
SFX 2223 Y 1
SFX 2223 n yl n
SFX 4701 Y 1
SFX 4701 n ydighangha n
SFX 3455 Y 1
SFX 3455 a miduq a
SFX 4171 Y 1
SFX 4171 k genliki k
SFX 3312 Y 1
SFX 3312 k lmeydighan k
SFX 2926 Y 1
SFX 2926 p genliki p
SFX 1893 Y 1
SFX 1893 r lmeydighan r
SFX 3888 Y 1
SFX 3888 r ldat r
SFX 1314 Y 1
SFX 1314 p wersun p
SFX 1880 Y 1
SFX 1880 d rin d
SFX 2646 Y 1
SFX 2646 r irliq r
SFX 759 Y 1
SFX 759 i chigha i
SFX 2483 Y 1
SFX 2483 m chigha m
SFX 673 Y 1
SFX 673 k ymiz k
SFX 3383 Y 1
SFX 3383 l ymiz l
SFX 1308 Y 1
SFX 1308 a ikilerdin a
SFX 377 Y 1
SFX 377 i urulghan i
SFX 3558 Y 1
SFX 3558 p chigha p
SFX 266 Y 1
SFX 266 n ymiz n
SFX 4795 Y 1
SFX 4795 d mise d
SFX 369 Y 1
SFX 369 q ymiz q
SFX 3776 Y 1
SFX 3776 r ymiz r
SFX 1492 Y 1
SFX 1492 s ymiz s
SFX 4506 Y 1
SFX 4506 t rin t
SFX 2101 Y 1
SFX 2101 k mise k
SFX 2305 Y 1
SFX 2305 i emning i
SFX 2490 Y 1
SFX 2490 p wermek p
SFX 2196 Y 1
SFX 2196 a iwetmek a
SFX 3381 Y 1
SFX 3381 r zisi r
SFX 2748 Y 1
SFX 2748 a itimen a
SFX 2932 Y 1
SFX 2932 i enning i
SFX 1623 Y 1
SFX 1623 a ikide a
SFX 4416 Y 1
SFX 4416 m enning m
SFX 2583 Y 1
SFX 2583 n enning n
SFX 594 Y 1
SFX 594 i chilarning i
SFX 3136 Y 1
SFX 3136 p ngchi p
SFX 4271 Y 1
SFX 4271 r ngchi r
SFX 1775 Y 1
SFX 1775 m chilarning m
SFX 2582 Y 1
SFX 2582 u enning u
SFX 2185 Y 1
SFX 2185 a liqqa a
SFX 4586 Y 1
SFX 4586 d liqqa d
SFX 470 Y 1
SFX 470 a ki a
SFX 3032 Y 1
SFX 3032 q lghini q
SFX 2005 Y 1
SFX 2005 i ekke i
SFX 1118 Y 1
SFX 1118 d ki d
SFX 4456 Y 1
SFX 4456 g wa g
SFX 4078 Y 1
SFX 4078 k mde k
SFX 4974 Y 1
SFX 4974 h wa h
SFX 4847 Y 1
SFX 4847 i ki i
SFX 2522 Y 1
SFX 2522 l mde l
SFX 4973 Y 1
SFX 4973 i wa i
SFX 4550 Y 1
SFX 4550 a mighandek a
SFX 4520 Y 1
SFX 4520 a onik a
SFX 4334 Y 1
SFX 4334 n ki n
SFX 3470 Y 1
SFX 3470 q liqqa q
SFX 1267 Y 1
SFX 1267 a inishigha a
SFX 3873 Y 1
SFX 3873 s liqqa s
SFX 1825 Y 1
SFX 1825 p wa p
SFX 184 Y 1
SFX 184 q ki q
SFX 1145 Y 1
SFX 1145 r ki r
SFX 3614 Y 1
SFX 3614 t rdimu t
SFX 843 Y 1
SFX 843 s ki s
SFX 2545 Y 1
SFX 2545 t ki t
SFX 3788 Y 1
SFX 3788 u wa u
SFX 3692 Y 1
SFX 3692 z ki z
SFX 2347 Y 1
SFX 2347 k lliq k
SFX 2326 Y 1
SFX 2326 r shturghuch r
SFX 2565 Y 1
SFX 2565 a ighuchisi a
SFX 4132 Y 1
SFX 4132 a iringizdin a
SFX 4814 Y 1
SFX 4814 q lliq q
SFX 2891 Y 1
SFX 2891 a lashqan a
SFX 231 Y 1
SFX 231 a ilargha a
SFX 1879 Y 1
SFX 1879 t rmen t
SFX 3290 Y 1
SFX 3290 p ngju p
SFX 2211 Y 1
SFX 2211 e htek e
SFX 2034 Y 1
SFX 2034 a man a
SFX 4584 Y 1
SFX 4584 a lirim a
SFX 3459 Y 1
SFX 3459 a maptu a
SFX 2184 Y 1
SFX 2184 d lirim d
SFX 3631 Y 1
SFX 3631 m nliqi m
SFX 3864 Y 1
SFX 3864 k man k
SFX 638 Y 1
SFX 638 l man l
SFX 2141 Y 1
SFX 2141 i ekning i
SFX 1547 Y 1
SFX 1547 q nliqi q
SFX 2747 Y 1
SFX 2747 a iting a
SFX 4583 Y 1
SFX 4583 k lirim k
SFX 3149 Y 1
SFX 3149 l maptu l
SFX 3673 Y 1
SFX 3673 s lirim s
SFX 2619 Y 1
SFX 2619 m nisi m
SFX 135 Y 1
SFX 135 z man z
SFX 1342 Y 1
SFX 1342 i chiliqqa i
SFX 3818 Y 1
SFX 3818 d ridi d
SFX 2634 Y 1
SFX 2634 k lmeslik k
SFX 2526 Y 1
SFX 2526 r lmeslik r
SFX 4012 Y 1
SFX 4012 r shtrgchi r
SFX 2657 Y 1
SFX 2657 a ilidi a
SFX 1180 Y 1
SFX 1180 a ilanmaq a
SFX 2964 Y 1
SFX 2964 i ulushi i
SFX 959 Y 1
SFX 959 p walghili p
SFX 6 Y 1
SFX 6 a ila a
SFX 4897 Y 1
SFX 4897 d ila d
SFX 1429 Y 1
SFX 1429 l ila l
SFX 1572 Y 1
SFX 1572 n ila n
SFX 1271 Y 1
SFX 1271 o ila o
SFX 774 Y 1
SFX 774 a ighanliqtin a
SFX 326 Y 1
SFX 326 k ytti k
SFX 186 Y 1
SFX 186 a iz a
SFX 1345 Y 1
SFX 1345 l ytti l
SFX 3775 Y 1
SFX 3775 m ytti m
SFX 18 Y 1
SFX 18 a ur a
SFX 138 Y 1
SFX 138 n ytti n
SFX 2065 Y 1
SFX 2065 p watqanidi p
SFX 139 Y 1
SFX 139 q ytti q
SFX 971 Y 1
SFX 971 r ytti r
SFX 1058 Y 1
SFX 1058 s ytti s
SFX 623 Y 1
SFX 623 t ytti t
SFX 29 Y 1
SFX 29 i ur i
SFX 2426 Y 1
SFX 2426 m ndimu m
SFX 2847 Y 1
SFX 2847 y ptila y
SFX 1915 Y 1
SFX 1915 a ighanning a
SFX 3027 Y 1
SFX 3027 k lma k
SFX 4790 Y 1
SFX 4790 q ndimu q
SFX 4212 Y 1
SFX 4212 n ur n
SFX 3042 Y 1
SFX 3042 o iz o
SFX 3244 Y 1
SFX 3244 o ur o
SFX 1305 Y 1
SFX 1305 a iwatqan a
SFX 3582 Y 1
SFX 3582 p ur p
SFX 121 Y 1
SFX 121 a ning a
SFX 1465 Y 1
SFX 1465 q lma q
SFX 258 Y 1
SFX 258 d ning d
SFX 2621 Y 1
SFX 2621 e ning e
SFX 4854 Y 1
SFX 4854 a iyalmisa a
SFX 3035 Y 1
SFX 3035 d lerni d
SFX 3520 Y 1
SFX 3520 a igchi a
SFX 4839 Y 1
SFX 4839 s larnimu s
SFX 1031 Y 1
SFX 1031 z iz z
SFX 1021 Y 1
SFX 1021 i ning i
SFX 3697 Y 1
SFX 3697 m iwatqan m
SFX 288 Y 1
SFX 288 k ning k
SFX 3252 Y 1
SFX 3252 a turghan a
SFX 50 Y 1
SFX 50 l ning l
SFX 4925 Y 1
SFX 4925 p gchiler p
SFX 4859 Y 1
SFX 4859 o iwatqan o
SFX 7 Y 1
SFX 7 m ning m
SFX 4647 Y 1
SFX 4647 e hng e
SFX 1728 Y 1
SFX 1728 p watattim p
SFX 1197 Y 1
SFX 1197 k lerni k
SFX 730 Y 1
SFX 730 i urghili i
SFX 431 Y 1
SFX 431 q ning q
SFX 359 Y 1
SFX 359 r ning r
SFX 284 Y 1
SFX 284 s ning s
SFX 488 Y 1
SFX 488 t ning t
SFX 1320 Y 1
SFX 1320 u ning u
SFX 2741 Y 1
SFX 2741 r lerni r
SFX 1661 Y 1
SFX 1661 s lerni s
SFX 4323 Y 1
SFX 4323 t lerni t
SFX 2858 Y 1
SFX 2858 x ning x
SFX 2676 Y 1
SFX 2676 a ernila a
SFX 114 Y 1
SFX 114 z ning z
SFX 706 Y 1
SFX 706 a ishimiz a
SFX 4337 Y 1
SFX 4337 a iya a
SFX 3993 Y 1
SFX 3993 i ursingiz i
SFX 376 Y 1
SFX 376 i yen i
SFX 2393 Y 1
SFX 2393 n yen n
SFX 3233 Y 1
SFX 3233 p watqanliqimni p
SFX 3580 Y 1
SFX 3580 i ursh i
SFX 4454 Y 1
SFX 4454 p wersingiz p
SFX 2625 Y 1
SFX 2625 m nchiliq m
SFX 2241 Y 1
SFX 2241 r shla r
SFX 1376 Y 1
SFX 1376 i urushigha i
SFX 3340 Y 1
SFX 3340 a inimen a
SFX 919 Y 1
SFX 919 k yilik k
SFX 1798 Y 1
SFX 1798 l mchi l
SFX 3386 Y 1
SFX 3386 n yilik n
SFX 3446 Y 1
SFX 3446 p ngli p
SFX 4806 Y 1
SFX 4806 r mchi r
SFX 2198 Y 1
SFX 2198 a ishiwatidu a
SFX 195 Y 1
SFX 195 a erge a
SFX 2152 Y 1
SFX 2152 a uchilarni a
SFX 4797 Y 1
SFX 4797 l mil l
SFX 4422 Y 1
SFX 4422 u ekmu u
SFX 3530 Y 1
SFX 3530 i go i
SFX 1232 Y 1
SFX 1232 a iliqi a
SFX 1204 Y 1
SFX 1204 i erge i
SFX 813 Y 1
SFX 813 a lashmaq a
SFX 802 Y 1
SFX 802 k erge k
SFX 2856 Y 1
SFX 2856 q nishmaq q
SFX 3894 Y 1
SFX 3894 d lashmaq d
SFX 4917 Y 1
SFX 4917 p go p
SFX 4942 Y 1
SFX 4942 m chilerni m
SFX 4728 Y 1
SFX 4728 b tlar b
SFX 3264 Y 1
SFX 3264 i rshtiki i
SFX 2113 Y 1
SFX 2113 k lashmaq k
SFX 2365 Y 1
SFX 2365 a imi a
SFX 4400 Y 1
SFX 4400 y go y
SFX 3128 Y 1
SFX 3128 m nluq m
SFX 1846 Y 1
SFX 1846 a linip a
SFX 4314 Y 1
SFX 4314 d linip d
SFX 1976 Y 1
SFX 1976 q lashmaq q
SFX 4861 Y 1
SFX 4861 a iwatatti a
SFX 4328 Y 1
SFX 4328 r lashmaq r
SFX 2112 Y 1
SFX 2112 s lashmaq s
SFX 3687 Y 1
SFX 3687 t lashmaq t
SFX 1553 Y 1
SFX 1553 k meslik k
SFX 3266 Y 1
SFX 3266 d ris d
SFX 1912 Y 1
SFX 1912 m imi m
SFX 2441 Y 1
SFX 2441 k linip k
SFX 1965 Y 1
SFX 1965 l ne l
SFX 4165 Y 1
SFX 4165 d ghudek d
SFX 826 Y 1
SFX 826 m ne m
SFX 1083 Y 1
SFX 1083 p walghandek p
SFX 3156 Y 1
SFX 3156 q linip q
SFX 4540 Y 1
SFX 4540 r ne r
SFX 2440 Y 1
SFX 2440 s linip s
SFX 338 Y 1
SFX 338 a ighini a
SFX 4126 Y 1
SFX 4126 a itipla a
SFX 3989 Y 1
SFX 3989 p walalaydu p
SFX 4920 Y 1
SFX 4920 s ghudek s
SFX 1583 Y 1
SFX 1583 n yim n
SFX 3618 Y 1
SFX 3618 r qsiz r
SFX 3270 Y 1
SFX 3270 s qsiz s
SFX 1395 Y 1
SFX 1395 a iqingni a
SFX 1094 Y 1
SFX 1094 k lni k
